test/src/gt-norm-yamls/noun-even_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - biehttalanváldi: # VALDI
    biehttalanváldi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [biehttalanválde-]
    biehttalanváldi+N+Sg+Nom: biehttalanváldi
    biehttalanváldi+N+Sg+Gen: biehttalanválddi
#    biehttalanváldi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: biehttalanváldáme # commented out, as the form is also commented out in lexc
    biehttalanváldi+N+Sg+Acc: biehttalanválddi
    biehttalanváldi+N+Sg+Ill: biehttalanváldái
    biehttalanváldi+N+Sg+Loc: biehttalanválddis
    biehttalanváldi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: biehttalanválddistan
    biehttalanváldi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: biehttalanválddistat
    biehttalanváldi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: biehttalanválddiinan
    biehttalanváldi+N+Pl+Acc: biehttalanválddiid
    biehttalanváldi+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: biehttalanválddiidasat
    biehttalanváldi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: biehttalanválddiideameguin
    biehttalanváldi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: biehttalanválddáš
    biehttalanváldi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: biehttalanválddážis
    biehttalanváldi+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: biehttalanválddálažžan
    biehttalanváldi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: biehttalanválddeheapme

  Noun - sieluráfi: # RAFI
    sieluráfi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: sieluráfi-
    sieluráfi+N+Sg+Nom: sieluráfi
    sieluráfi+N+Sg+Gen: sieluráfi
    sieluráfi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: sieluráfáme
    sieluráfi+N+Sg+Acc: sieluráfi
    sieluráfi+N+Sg+Ill: sieluráfái
    sieluráfi+N+Sg+Loc: sieluráfis
    sieluráfi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: sieluráfistan
    sieluráfi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: sieluráfistat
    sieluráfi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: sieluráfiinan
    sieluráfi+N+Pl+Acc: sieluráfiid
    sieluráfi+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: sieluráfiidasat
    sieluráfi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: sieluráfiideameguin
    sieluráfi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sieluráfáš
    sieluráfi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: sieluráfážis
    sieluráfi+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: sieluráfálažžan

  Noun - proseassa: # STAHTA
    proseassa+N+G3+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: proseassa-
    proseassa+N+G3+Sg+Nom: proseassa
    proseassa+N+G3+Sg+Gen: proseassa
    proseassa+N+G3+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: proseassame
    proseassa+N+G3+Sg+Acc: proseassa
    proseassa+N+G3+Sg+Ill: prosessii
    proseassa+N+G3+Sg+Loc: proseassas
    proseassa+N+G3+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: proseassastan
    proseassa+N+G3+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: proseassastat
    proseassa+N+G3+Sg+Com+PxSg1: proseassainan
    proseassa+N+G3+Pl+Acc: proseassaid
    proseassa+N+G3+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: proseassaidasat
    proseassa+N+G3+Pl+Com+PxDu1: proseassaideameguin
    proseassa+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: proseassaš
    proseassa+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: proseassažis
    proseassa+N+G3+Der/lasj+A+Ess: proseassalažžan
    proseassa+N+G3+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: proseassaheapme


  Noun - kopiija: # IIJA
    kopiija+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: kopiija-
    kopiija+N+Sg+Nom: kopiija
    kopiija+N+Sg+Gen: kopiija
    kopiija+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: kopiijame
    kopiija+N+Sg+Acc: kopiija
    kopiija+N+Sg+Ill: [kopiijai, kopiijii]
    kopiija+N+Sg+Loc: kopiijas
    kopiija+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: kopiijastan
    kopiija+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: kopiijastat
    kopiija+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: kopiijainan
    kopiija+N+Pl+Acc: kopiijaid
    kopiija+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: kopiijaidasat
    kopiija+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: kopiijaideameguin
    kopiija+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: kopiijaš
    kopiija+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: kopiijažis
    kopiija+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: kopiijalažžan
    kopiija+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: kopiijaheapme


  Noun - vuotna: # GADDI
    vuotna+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: vuotna-
    vuotna+N+Sg+Nom: vuotna
    vuotna+N+Sg+Gen: vuona
    vuotna+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: vuotname
    vuotna+N+Sg+Acc: vuona
    vuotna+N+Sg+Ill: vutnii
    vuotna+N+Sg+Loc: vuonas
    vuotna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: vuonastan
    vuotna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: vuonastat
    vuotna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: vuonainan
    vuotna+N+Pl+Acc: vuonaid
    vuotna+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: vuonaidasat
    vuotna+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: vuonaideameguin
    vuotna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: vuonaš
    vuotna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: vuonažis
    vuotna+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: vuonaheapme
    vuotna+N+Der/A+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: vuonabui
    vuotna+N+Der/A+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: vuonamusaide

  Noun - beavdi: # GADDISHORT
    beavdi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [beavde-]
    beavdi+N+Sg+Nom: beavdi
    beavdi+N+Sg+Gen: [beavddi, beavdde]
    beavdi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: beavdáme
    beavdi+N+Sg+Acc: beavddi
    beavdi+N+Sg+Ill: beavdái
    beavdi+N+Sg+Loc: beavddis
    beavdi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: beavddistan
    beavdi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: beavddistat
    beavdi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bevddiinan
    beavdi+N+Pl+Acc: bevddiid
    beavdi+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: bevddiidasat
    beavdi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bevddiideameguin
    beavdi+N+Der/A+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: beavddibui
    beavdi+N+Der/A+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: beavddimusaide
    
  Noun - davviluondu: # LUONDU
    davviluondu+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: davviluonddu-
    davviluondu+N+Sg+Nom: davviluondu
    davviluondu+N+Sg+Gen: davviluonddu
    davviluondu+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: davvilundome
    davviluondu+N+Sg+Acc: davviluonddu
    davviluondu+N+Sg+Ill: davvilundui
    davviluondu+N+Sg+Loc: davviluonddus
    davviluondu+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: davviluonddustan
    davviluondu+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: davviluonddustat
    davviluondu+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: davviluondduinan
    davviluondu+N+Pl+Acc: davviluondduid
    davviluondu+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: davviluondduidasat
    davviluondu+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: davviluondduideameguin


  Noun - ruoktu: # RUOKTU
    ruoktu+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [ruovttu-, ruovtto-]
    ruoktu+N+Sg+Nom: ruoktu
    ruoktu+N+Sg+Gen: [ruovttu, ruovtto]
    ruoktu+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ruktome
    ruoktu+N+Sg+Acc: ruovttu
    ruoktu+N+Sg+Ill: ruktui
    ruoktu+N+Sg+Loc: ruovttus
    ruoktu+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: ruovttustan
    ruoktu+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ruovttustat
    ruoktu+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: ruovttuinan
    ruoktu+N+Pl+Acc: ruovttuid
    ruoktu+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: ruovttuidasat
    ruoktu+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: ruovttuideameguin

  Noun - stivremánni: # MANNI
    stivremánni+N+G3+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [stivremánni-, stivremánne-]
    stivremánni+N+G3+Sg+Nom: stivremánni
    stivremánni+N+G3+Sg+Gen: [stivremánni, stivremánne]
    stivremánni+N+G3+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: stivremánnáme
    stivremánni+N+G3+Sg+Acc: stivremánni
    stivremánni+N+G3+Sg+Ill: [stivremánnii, stivremánnái]
    stivremánni+N+G3+Sg+Loc: stivremánnis
    stivremánni+N+G3+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: stivremánnistan
    stivremánni+N+G3+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: stivremánnistat
    stivremánni+N+G3+Sg+Com+PxSg1: stivremánniinan
    stivremánni+N+G3+Pl+Acc: stivremánniid
    stivremánni+N+G3+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: stivremánniidasat
    stivremánni+N+G3+Pl+Com+PxDu1: stivremánniideameguin
    stivremánni+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: stivremánnáš
    stivremánni+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: stivremánnážis
    stivremánni+N+G3+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: stivremánniheapme


  Noun - infrastruktuvra: # STRUKTUR
    infrastruktuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [infrastruktur-, infrastruktuvra-]
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Nom: infrastruktuvra
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Gen: infrastruktuvrra
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: infrastruktuvrame
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Acc: infrastruktuvrra
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Ill: infrastruktuvrii
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Loc: infrastruktuvrras
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: infrastruktuvrrastan
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: infrastruktuvrrastat
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: infrastruktuvrrainan
    infrastruktuvra+N+Pl+Acc: infrastruktuvrraid
    infrastruktuvra+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: infrastruktuvrraidasat
    infrastruktuvra+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: infrastruktuvrraideameguin
    infrastruktuvra+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: infrastruktuvrraš
    infrastruktuvra+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: infrastruktuvrražis
    infrastruktuvra+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: infrastruktuvrralažžan
    infrastruktuvra+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: infrastruktuvrraheapme

  Noun - kultuvra: # KULTUR
    kultuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [kultur-, kulttor-, kultuvra-]
    kultuvra+N+Sg+Nom: kultuvra
    kultuvra+N+Sg+Gen: kultuvrra
    kultuvra+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: kultuvrame
    kultuvra+N+Sg+Acc: kultuvrra
    kultuvra+N+Sg+Ill: kultuvrii
    kultuvra+N+Sg+Loc: kultuvrras
    kultuvra+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: kultuvrrastan
    kultuvra+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: kultuvrrastat
    kultuvra+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: kultuvrrainan
    kultuvra+N+Pl+Acc: kultuvrraid
    kultuvra+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: kultuvrraidasat
    kultuvra+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: kultuvrraideameguin
    kultuvra+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: kultuvrraš
    kultuvra+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: kultuvrražis
    kultuvra+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: kultuvrralažžan
    kultuvra+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: kultuvrraheapme

  Noun - mašiidna: # MAŠIIDNA
    mašiidna+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [mášen-, mášin-, mašiidna-]
    mašiidna+N+Sg+Nom: [mašiidna,   mášen]
    mašiidna+N+Sg+Gen: [mašiinna,   mášena]
    mašiidna+N+Sg+Acc: [mašiinna,   mášena]
    mašiidna+N+Sg+Ill: [mašiidnii,  mášenii]
    mašiidna+N+Sg+Loc: [mašiinnas,  mášenis]
    mašiidna+N+Pl+Acc: [mašiinnaid, mášeniid]

    mašiidna+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [mašiidname,         mášeneame]
    mašiidna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [mašiinnastan,       mášenisttán]
    mašiidna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [mašiinnastat,       mášenisttát]
    mašiidna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: [mašiinnainan,       mášeniinnán]
    mašiidna+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: [mašiinnaidasat,     mášeniiddásat]
    mašiidna+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: [mašiinnaideameguin, mášeniiddámeguin]

    mašiidna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [mašiinnaš,      mášenaš]
    mašiidna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: [mašiinnažis,    mášenaččas]
    mašiidna+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom:   [mašiinnaheapme, mášenheapme]

  Noun - bensiidna: # BENSIN
    bensiidna+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [bensen-, bensin-, bensiidna-]
    bensiidna+N+Sg+Nom: bensiidna
    bensiidna+N+Sg+Gen: bensiinna
    bensiidna+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bensiidname
    bensiidna+N+Sg+Acc: bensiinna
    bensiidna+N+Sg+Ill: bensiidnii
    bensiidna+N+Sg+Loc: bensiinnas
    bensiidna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: bensiinnastan
    bensiidna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: bensiinnastat
    bensiidna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bensiinnainan
    bensiidna+N+Pl+Acc: bensiinnaid
    bensiidna+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: bensiinnaidasat
    bensiidna+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bensiinnaideameguin
    bensiidna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bensiinnaš
    bensiidna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: bensiinnažis
    bensiidna+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: bensiinnaheapme

  Noun - insuliidna: # ADRENALIN
    insuliidna+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [insuliidna-, insulin-]
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Nom: insuliidna
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Gen: insuliinna
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: insuliidname
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Acc: insuliinna
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Ill: insuliidnii
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Loc: insuliinnas
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: insuliinnastan
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: insuliinnastat
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: insuliinnainan
    insuliidna+N+Pl+Acc: insuliinnaid
    insuliidna+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: insuliinnaidasat
    insuliidna+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: insuliinnaideameguin
    insuliidna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: insuliinnaš
    insuliidna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: insuliinnažis
    insuliidna+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: insuliinnalažžan
    insuliidna+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: insuliinnaheapme

  Noun - deskripšuvdna: # TELEFON
    deskripšuvdna+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [deskripšuvdna-, deskripšun-]
    deskripšuvdna+N+Sg+Nom: deskripšuvdna
    deskripšuvdna+N+Sg+Gen: deskripšuvnna
    deskripšuvdna+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: deskripšuvdname
    deskripšuvdna+N+Sg+Acc: deskripšuvnna
    deskripšuvdna+N+Sg+Ill: deskripšuvdnii
    deskripšuvdna+N+Sg+Loc: deskripšuvnnas
    deskripšuvdna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: deskripšuvnnastan
    deskripšuvdna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: deskripšuvnnastat
    deskripšuvdna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: deskripšuvnnainan
    deskripšuvdna+N+Pl+Acc: deskripšuvnnaid
    deskripšuvdna+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: deskripšuvnnaidasat
    deskripšuvdna+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: deskripšuvnnaideameguin
    deskripšuvdna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: deskripšuvnnaš
    deskripšuvdna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: deskripšuvnnažis
    deskripšuvdna+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: deskripšuvnnalažžan
    deskripšuvdna+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: deskripšuvnnaheapme
